Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1237
Foreign jurisdiction; civil action; subpoena for discovery in Nebraska; powers.

(1) When authorized by rules promulgated by the Supreme Court, the clerk of the district court may issue a subpoena for discovery in Nebraska for a civil proceeding pending in a foreign jurisdiction. Such a subpoena may command a person to testify at a deposition or command a nonparty to provide discovery without a deposition.

(2) The Supreme Court may promulgate rules for subpoenas under this section. The rules may specify the amount of a fee, if any, that must be paid to the clerk of the district court for the issuance of such subpoenas. Any such rules shall not conflict with laws governing such matters.

Laws 2020, LB912, § 11.